Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 4 State Funds
35-4-27.
Indirect cost recoveries on restricted receipt accounts.

Indirect cost recoveries of ten percent (10%) of cash receipts shall be transferred from all restricted-receipt accounts, to be recorded as general revenues in the general fund. However, there shall be no transfer from cash receipts with restrictions received exclusively: (1) From contributions from nonprofit charitable organizations; (2) From the assessment of indirect cost-recovery rates on federal grant funds; or (3) Through transfers from state agencies to the department of administration for the payment of debt service. These indirect cost recoveries shall be applied to all accounts, unless prohibited by federal law or regulation, court order, or court settlement. The following restricted receipt accounts shall not be subject to the provisions of this section:

Executive Office of Health and Human Services

Organ Transplant Fund

HIV Care Grant Drug Rebates

Health System Transformation Project

Rhode Island Statewide Opioid Abatement Account

HCBS Support-ARPA

HCBS Admin Support-ARPA

Department of Human Services

Veterans’ home — Restricted account

Veterans’ home — Resident benefits

Pharmaceutical Rebates Account

Demand Side Management Grants

Veteran’s Cemetery Memorial Fund

Donations — New Veterans’ Home Construction

Department of Health

Pandemic medications and equipment account

Miscellaneous Donations/Grants from Non-Profits

State Loan Repayment Match

Healthcare Information Technology

Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals

Eleanor Slater non-Medicaid third-party payor account

Hospital Medicare Part D Receipts

RICLAS Group Home Operations

Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing

Emergency and public communication access account

Department of Environmental Management

National heritage revolving fund

Environmental response fund II

Underground storage tanks registration fees

De Coppet Estate Fund

Rhode Island Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission

Historic preservation revolving loan fund

Historic Preservation loan fund — Interest revenue

Department of Public Safety

E-911 Uniform Emergency Telephone System

Forfeited property — Retained

Forfeitures — Federal

Forfeited property — Gambling

Donation — Polygraph and Law Enforcement Training

Rhode Island State Firefighter’s League Training Account

Fire Academy Training Fees Account

Attorney General

Forfeiture of property

Federal forfeitures

Attorney General multi-state account

Forfeited property — Gambling

Department of Administration

OER Reconciliation Funding

Health Insurance Market Integrity Fund

RI Health Benefits Exchange

Information Technology Investment Fund

Restore and replacement — Insurance coverage

Convention Center Authority rental payments

Investment Receipts — TANS

OPEB System Restricted Receipt Account

Car Rental Tax/Surcharge-Warwick Share

Grants Management Administration

Executive Office of Commerce

Housing Resources Commission Restricted Account

Housing Production Fund

Department of Revenue

DMV Modernization Project

Jobs Tax Credit Redemption Fund

Legislature

Audit of federal assisted programs

Department of Children, Youth and Families

Children’s Trust Accounts — SSI

Military Staff

RI Military Family Relief Fund

RI National Guard Counterdrug Program

Treasury

Admin. Expenses — State Retirement System

Retirement — Treasury Investment Options

Defined Contribution — Administration - RR

Violent Crimes Compensation — Refunds

Treasury Research Fellowship

Business Regulation

Banking Division Reimbursement Account

Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner Reimbursement Account

Securities Division Reimbursement Account

Commercial Licensing and Racing and Athletics Division Reimbursement Account

Insurance Division Reimbursement Account

Historic Preservation Tax Credit Account

Marijuana Trust Fund

Social Equity Assistance Fund

Judiciary

Arbitration Fund Restricted Receipt Account

Third-Party Grants

RI Judiciary Technology Surcharge Account

Department of Elementary and Secondary Education

Statewide Student Transportation Services Account

School for the Deaf Fee-for-Service Account

School for the Deaf — School Breakfast and Lunch Program

Davies Career and Technical School Local Education Aid Account

Davies — National School Breakfast & Lunch Program

School Construction Services

Office of the Postsecondary Commissioner

Higher Education and Industry Center

IGT STEM Scholarships

Department of Labor and Training

Job Development Fund

Rhode Island Council on the Arts

Governors’ Portrait Donation Fund

Statewide records management system account

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 69, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 1, § 20; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 39, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 22, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 10, § 6; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 28, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 10, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 10, § 7; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 12, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 2, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 6; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 2, § 5, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 304, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 305, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 2, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

35-4-28.
Conversion of restricted receipt accounts to general revenue accounts.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in each fiscal year, the following restricted receipt accounts will be converted to general revenue accounts:

Alcohol — Highway safety;

Highway safety program;

Court improvement project fund;

Criminal justice information system;

Court improvement fund — ACIS;

Appeal fee administrative adj;

Ct improv proj fund electronic data storage;

Admin adjudication court — DWI;

Substance abuse — Prevention — AAC admin;

DWI retraining; and

Collection agency AAC.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 1.